Utah statutes.
53A-15-1214.   Review by legislative auditor general.

The legislative auditor general shall conduct a review and issue a report on the Statewide Online Education Program after the conclusion of the 2013-14 school year.



Enacted by Chapter 419, 2011 General Session

